California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate the credit for buildings located in DDAs or QCTs that are restricted to having 50 percent of the building’s occupants be special needs households, as defined in the California Code of Regulations by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, or receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), even if the taxpayer receives federal credits pursuant to Section 42(d)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in credit for buildings in high-cost areas, provided that the credit allowed under this section shall not exceed 30 percent of the eligible basis of the building.

(iii) On and
 after January 1, 2018, notwithstanding clause (i), the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate the credit pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) even if the taxpayer receives federal credits, pursuant to Section 42(d)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in credit for buildings in high-cost areas.

(F) (i) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate a credit under this section in exchange for a credit allocated pursuant to Section 42(d)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in credit for buildings in high-cost areas, in amounts up to 30 percent of the eligible basis of a building if the credits allowed under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, are reduced by an equivalent amount.

(ii) An equivalent amount shall be determined by the
 California Tax Credit Allocation Committee based upon the relative amount required to produce an equivalent state tax credit to the taxpayer.

(c) Section 42(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to applicable percentage: 70 percent present value credit for certain new buildings; 30 percent present value credit for certain other buildings, shall be modified as follows:

(1) In the case of any qualified low-income building that receives an allocation after 1989 and is a new building not federally subsidized, the term “applicable percentage” means the following:

(A) For each of the first three years, the percentage prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury for new buildings that are not federally subsidized for the taxable year, determined in accordance with the requirements of Section 42(b)(2) of the Internal
 Revenue Code, relating to temporary minimum credit rate for nonfederally subsidized new buildings, in lieu of the percentage prescribed in Section 42(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) For the fourth year, the difference between 30 percent and the sum of the applicable percentages for the first three years.

(2) In the case of any qualified low-income building that is a new building and is federally subsidized and receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), the term “applicable percentage” means for the first three years, 9 percent of the qualified basis of the building, and for the fourth year, 3 percent of the qualified basis of the building.

(3) In the case of any qualified low-income building that receives an allocation after 1989 pursuant to subparagraph (A)
 of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) and that is a new building that is federally subsidized or that is an existing building that is “at risk of conversion,” the term “applicable percentage” means the following:

(A) For each of the first three years, the percentage prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury for new buildings that are federally subsidized for the taxable year.

(B) For the fourth year, the difference between 13 percent and the sum of the applicable percentages for the first three years.

(4) In the case of any qualified low-income building that meets all of the requirements of subparagraphs (A) through (D), inclusive, the term “applicable percentage” means 30 percent for each of the first three years and 5 percent for the fourth year. A qualified low-income building receiving an allocation under this
 paragraph is ineligible to also receive an allocation under paragraph (2).

(A) The qualified low-income building is at least 15 years old.

(B) The qualified low-income building is either:

(i) Serving households of very low income or extremely low income such that the average maximum household income as restricted, pursuant to an existing regulatory agreement with a federal, state, county, local, or other governmental agency, is not more than 45 percent of the area median gross income, as determined under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, adjusted by household size, and a tax credit regulatory agreement is entered into for a period of not less than 55 years restricting the average targeted household income to no more than 45 percent of the area median income.

(ii) Financed under Section 514 or 521 of the National Housing Act of 1949 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485).

(C) The qualified low-income building would have insufficient credits under paragraphs (2) and (3) to complete substantial rehabilitation due to a low appraised value.

(D) The qualified low-income building will complete the substantial rehabilitation in connection with the credit allocation herein.

(5) For purposes of this section, the term “at risk of conversion,” with respect to an existing property, means a property that satisfies all of the following criteria:

(A) The property is a multifamily rental housing development in which at least 50 percent of the units receive governmental assistance
 pursuant to any of the following:

(i) New construction, substantial rehabilitation, moderate rehabilitation, property disposition, and loan management set-aside programs, or any other program providing project-based assistance pursuant to Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, Section 1437f of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended.

(ii) The Below-Market-Interest-Rate Program pursuant to Section 221(d)(3) of the National Housing Act, Sections 1715l(d)(3) and (5) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(iii) Section 236 of the National Housing Act, Section 1715z-1 of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(iv) Programs for rent supplement assistance pursuant to Section 101 of the Housing and Urban Development Act of 1965, Section
 1701s of Title 12 of the United States Code, as amended.

(v) Programs under Sections 514, 515, 516, 533, and 538 of the Housing Act of 1949 (Public Law 81-171), as amended.

(vi) The low-income housing credit program set forth in Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, this section, and Sections 17058 and 23610.5.

(vii) Programs for loans or grants administered by the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(viii) Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1701q), as amended.

(ix) Section 142(d) of the Internal Revenue Code or its predecessors.

(x) Section 147 of the
 Internal Revenue Code, as enacted by the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-514), or as subsequently amended, including as amended by the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (Public Law 115-97) and all amendments enacted prior to the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (Public Law 115-97).

(xi) Title I of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974, as amended.

(xii) Title II of the Cranston-Gonzalez National Affordable Housing Act of 1990, as amended.

(xiii) Titles IV and V of the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act of 1987, as amended, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development’s Supportive Housing Program, Shelter Plus Care Program, and surplus federal property disposition program.

(xiv) The following assistance provided by counties
 and cities in exchange for restrictions on the maximum rents that may be charged for units within a multifamily rental housing development and on the maximum tenant income as a condition of eligibility for occupancy of the unit subject to the rent restriction, as reflected by a recorded agreement with a county or city:

(I) Loans or grants provided using tax increment financing pursuant to the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code).

(II) Local housing trust funds, as referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 50843 of the Health and Safety Code.

(III) The sale or lease of public property at or below market rates.

(IV) The granting of density bonuses, or concessions
 or incentives, including fee waivers, parking variances, or amendments to general plans, zoning, or redevelopment project area plans, pursuant to Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 65915) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(B) As used in subparagraph (A), “government assistance” shall not include the use of tenant-based housing choice vouchers under subsection (o) of Section 1437f of Title 42 of the United States Code, excluding paragraph (13), relating to project-based assistance. Restrictions shall not include any rent control or rent stabilization ordinance imposed by a county or city.

(C) If the development is subject to restrictions on rent and income levels, 50 percent of the units are also restricted to initial occupancy by lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) The restrictions on rent and income levels, excluding any restrictions recorded pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 65863.11 or Section 65863.13 of the Government Code or in connection with interim or acquisition financing, will terminate or the federally insured mortgage or rent subsidy contract on the property is eligible for prepayment or termination any time within five years before or after the date of application to the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(E) The entity acquiring the property enters into a regulatory agreement that requires the property to be operated in accordance with the requirements of Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code and any further requirements added by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee to implement the low-income housing tax credit established by Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 42),
 this section, and Sections 17058 and 23610.5 pursuant to Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 50199.4) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) The property satisfies the requirements of Section 42(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rehabilitation expenditures treated as separate new building, except that the provisions of Section 42(e)(3)(A)(ii)(I) shall not apply.

(6) On and after January 1, 2018, in the case of any qualified low-income building that is (A) farmworker housing, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code, and (B) is federally subsidized, the term “applicable percentage” means for each of the first three years, 20 percent of the qualified basis of the building, and for the fourth year, 15 percent of the qualified basis of the building.

(d) The term “qualified low-income housing project” as defined in Section 42(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified low-income building, is modified by adding the following requirements:

(1) The taxpayer shall be entitled to receive a cash distribution from the operations of the project, after funding required reserves, that, at the election of the taxpayer, is equal to:

(A) An amount not to exceed 8 percent of the lesser of:

(i) The owner equity that shall include the amount of the capital contributions actually paid to the housing sponsor and shall not include any amounts until they are paid on an investor note.

(ii) Twenty percent of the adjusted basis of the building as of
 the close of the first taxable year of the credit period.

(B) The amount of the cashflow from those units in the building that are not low-income units. For purposes of computing cashflow under this subparagraph, operating costs shall be allocated to the low-income units using the “floor space fraction,” as defined in Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit.

(C) Any amount allowed to be distributed under subparagraph (A) that is not available for distribution during the first 5 years of the compliance period may be accumulated and distributed any time during the first 15 years of the compliance period but not thereafter.

(2) The limitation on return shall apply in the aggregate to the partners if the housing sponsor is a partnership and in the aggregate to the shareholders if
 the housing sponsor is an “S” corporation.

(3) The housing sponsor shall apply any cash available for distribution in excess of the amount eligible to be distributed under paragraph (1) to reduce the rent on rent-restricted units or to increase the number of rent-restricted units subject to the tests of Section 42(g)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to in general.

(e) The provisions of Section 42(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to definition and special rules relating to credit period, shall be modified as follows:

(1) The term “credit period” as defined in Section 42(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credit period defined, is modified by substituting “four taxable years” for “10 taxable years.”

(2) The special rule for
 the first taxable year of the credit period under Section 42(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for 1st year of credit period, shall not apply to the tax credit under this section.

(3) Section 42(f)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to determination of applicable percentage with respect to increases in qualified basis after 1st year of credit period, is modified to read:

If, as of the close of any taxable year in the compliance period, after the first year of the credit period, the qualified basis of any building exceeds the qualified basis of that building as of the close of the first year of the credit period, the housing sponsor, to the extent of its tax credit allocation, shall be eligible for a credit on the excess in an amount equal to the applicable percentage determined pursuant to subdivision (c) for the four-year period beginning with the later of the taxable
 years in which the increase in qualified basis occurs.

(f) The provisions of Section 42(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on aggregate credit allowable with respect to projects located in a state, shall be modified as follows:

(1) Section 42(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to allocated credit amount to apply to all taxable years ending during or after credit allocation year, does not apply and instead the following provisions apply:

The total amount for the four-year credit period of the housing credit dollars allocated in a calendar year to any building shall reduce the aggregate housing credit dollar amount of the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee for the calendar year in which the allocation is made.

(2) Paragraphs (3), (4),
 (5), (6)(E)(i)(II), (6)(F), (6)(G), (6)(I), (7), and (8) of Section 42(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on aggregate credit allowable with respect to projects located in a state, do not apply to this section.

(g) The aggregate housing credit dollar amount that may be allocated annually by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee pursuant to this section, Section 17058, and Section 23610.5 shall be an amount equal to the sum of all the following:

(1) (A) Seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) for the 2001 calendar year, and, for the 2002 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) increased by the percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year exceeds the Consumer Price Index for the 2001 calendar year. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term
 “Consumer Price Index” means the last Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the federal Department of Labor.

(B) Five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) for the 2020 calendar year, and up to five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) for the 2021 calendar year and every year thereafter. Allocations shall only be available pursuant to this subparagraph in the 2021 calendar year and thereafter if the annual Budget Act, or if any bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Act, specifies an amount to be available for allocation in that calendar year by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, after the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee have adopted regulations, rules, or guidelines to align the programs of both committees with the objective of increasing production and containing costs as described in clause (iii). The California Tax Credit
 Allocation Committee shall accept applications for the 2021 calendar year not sooner than 30 days after these regulations, rules, or guidelines have been adopted. The California Debt Limit Allocation Committee shall not accept applications for the 2021 calendar year for bond allocations for an eligible project under this section prior to issuing, reviewing, and publishing a new tax-exempt private activity bond demand survey. A housing sponsor receiving a nonfederally subsidized allocation under subdivision (c) shall not be eligible for receipt of the housing credit allocated from the increased amount under this subparagraph. Except as provided in clause (vi), a housing sponsor receiving a nonfederally subsidized allocation under subdivision (c) shall remain eligible for receipt of the housing credit allocated from the credit ceiling amount under subparagraph (A).

(i) Eligible projects for allocations under this subparagraph include any new
 building, as defined in Section 42(i)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to newly constructed buildings, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, excluding rehabilitation expenditures under Section 42(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rehabilitation expenditures treated as separate new building, and is federally subsidized. Eligible projects for allocations under this subparagraph also include any retrofitting and repurposing of existing nonresidential structures, including, but not limited to, hotels and motels, that were converted to residential use within the previous five years from the date of the application.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for allocations pursuant to this subparagraph for the 2020 calendar year, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall consider projects located throughout the state and shall allocate housing credits, subject to the minimum federal requirements as
 set forth in Sections 42 and 142 of the Internal Revenue Code, the minimum requirements set forth in Sections 5033 and 5190 of the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee regulations, and the minimum set forth in Section 10326 of the Tax Credit Allocation Committee regulations, for projects that can begin construction within 180 days from award, subject to availability of funds.

(iii) (I) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for allocations pursuant to this subparagraph for the 2021 calendar year and thereafter, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee shall develop and prescribe regulations, rules, or guidelines necessary to implement a new allocation methodology that is aimed at increasing production and containing costs, which would include a scoring system that maximizes the efficient use of public subsidy and benefit created through the
 private activity bond and low-income housing tax credit programs. The factors for determining the efficient use of public subsidy and benefit shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(ia) The number and size of units developed including local incentives provided to increase density.

(ib) The proximity to amenities, jobs, and public transportation.

(ic) The location of the development.

(id) The delivery of housing affordable to very low and extremely low income households by the development.

(II) The efficient use of public subsidy and benefit criteria specified in this clause shall take into account the total state subsidy provided and prioritize cost containment and
 increased unit production. These regulations, rules, or guidelines developed pursuant to this subparagraph shall also consider updated definitions for at-risk preservation and new construction.

(III) For bond allocations for the 2021 calendar year to projects eligible for an allocation under this subparagraph, the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee may adopt emergency regulations.

(IV) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall consider amending the regulations establishing a scoring system, as required by this clause, to also grant, for farmworker housing as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code, maximum points to farmworker housing projects under the housing needs category, and an initial five points in the category for site amenities beyond those required as additional thresholds.

(iv) Of the amount available pursuant to this subparagraph, and notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate up to two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) for housing financed by the California Housing Finance Agency under its Mixed-Income Program.

(v) (I) For the calendar years of 2024 to 2034, inclusive, of the amount available pursuant to this subparagraph, the lesser of 5 percent of that amount or twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per calendar year shall be set aside for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code, and administered consistent with the credits available pursuant to paragraph (4).

(II) Any credits pursuant to this clause that
 remain unallocated following the conclusion of a funding round shall roll over to consecutive subsequent funding rounds in that calendar year with the exception that any credits that remain unallocated after the final funding round in that calendar year shall be added back to the aggregate amount of credits that may be allocated pursuant to this subparagraph.

(III) For the 2035 calendar year, and every year thereafter, of the amount available pursuant to this subparagraph, a portion of the amount allocated shall be set aside for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code. The amount set aside shall be determined by the Legislature upon consideration of the comprehensive strategy, or most recent update thereof, provided by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 50408.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(vi) (I) For any calendar year in which the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee has declared a competition for the award of tax-exempt bond authority for qualified residential rental projects, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate some or all of the credits allocated under this subparagraph, except for any credits allocated for housing financed by the California Housing Finance Agency under its Mixed-Income Program, for nonfederally subsidized buildings eligible for credits under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, and shall allocate the remainder of these credits for new buildings, as defined in Section 42(i)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to new buildings, that are federally subsidized and that can begin construction within a reasonable time, as determined by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(II) For any calendar year in which the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee has not declared a competition for the award of tax-exempt bond authority for qualified residential rental projects, projects receiving an award of credits pursuant to this subparagraph shall begin construction within a reasonable time, as determined by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(III) Notwithstanding subclauses (I) and (II), if credits available under this subparagraph remain unallocated after the final California Debt Limit Allocation Committee round for qualified residential rental projects in a given calendar year, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate some or all of the remaining credits for nonfederally subsidized buildings eligible for credits under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit.

(2) The unused housing credit ceiling, if any, for the preceding calendar years.

(3) The amount of housing credit ceiling returned in the calendar year. For purposes of this paragraph, the amount of housing credit dollar amount returned in the calendar year equals the housing credit dollar amount previously allocated to any project that does not become a qualified low-income housing project within the period required by this section or to any project with respect to which an allocation is canceled by mutual consent of the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the allocation recipient.

(4) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per calendar year for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) The amount of any unallocated or returned credits under former Sections 17053.14, 23608.2, and 23608.3, as those sections read prior to January 1, 2009, until fully exhausted for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) The term “compliance period” as defined in Section 42(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to compliance period, is modified to mean, with respect to any building, the period of 30 consecutive taxable years beginning with the first taxable year of the credit period with respect thereto.

(i) (1) Section 42(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to recapture of credit, shall not be applicable and the provisions in paragraph (2) shall be substituted in its place.

(2) The requirements of this section shall be set forth in a regulatory agreement between the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the housing sponsor, and the regulatory agreement shall be subordinated, when required, to any lien or encumbrance of any banks or other institutional lenders to the project. The regulatory agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 50199.14 of the Health and Safety Code, shall apply, provided that the agreement includes all of the following provisions:

(A) A term not less than the compliance period.

(B) A requirement that the agreement be recorded in the official records of the county in which the qualified low-income housing project is located.

(C) A provision stating which state and local
 agencies can enforce the regulatory agreement in the event the housing sponsor fails to satisfy any of the requirements of this section.

(D) A provision that the regulatory agreement shall be deemed a contract enforceable by tenants as third-party beneficiaries thereto and that allows individuals, whether prospective, present, or former occupants of the building, who meet the income limitation applicable to the building, the right to enforce the regulatory agreement in any state court.

(E) A provision incorporating the requirements of Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, as modified by this section.

(F) A requirement that the housing sponsor notify the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee or its designee and the local agency that can enforce the regulatory agreement if
 there is a determination by the Internal Revenue Service that the project is not in compliance with Section 42(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified low-income housing project.

(G) A requirement that the housing sponsor, as security for the performance of the housing sponsor’s obligations under the regulatory agreement, assign the housing sponsor’s interest in rents that it receives from the project, provided that until there is a default under the regulatory agreement, the housing sponsor is entitled to collect and retain the rents.

(H) A provision that the remedies available in the event of a default under the regulatory agreement that is not cured within a reasonable cure period include, but are not limited to, allowing any of the parties designated to enforce the regulatory agreement to collect all rents with respect to the project; taking possession of the
 project and operating the project in accordance with the regulatory agreement until the enforcer determines the housing sponsor is in a position to operate the project in accordance with the regulatory agreement; applying to any court for specific performance; securing the appointment of a receiver to operate the project; or any other relief as may be appropriate.

(j) (1) The committee shall allocate the housing credit on a regular basis consisting of two or more periods in each calendar year during which applications may be filed and considered. The committee shall establish application filing deadlines, the maximum percentage of federal and state low-income housing tax credit ceiling that may be allocated by the committee in that period, and the approximate date on which allocations shall be made. If the enactment of federal or state law, the adoption of rules or regulations, or other similar events prevent the use of
 two allocation periods, the committee may reduce the number of periods and adjust the filing deadlines, maximum percentage of credit allocated, and the allocation dates.

(2) The committee shall adopt a qualified allocation plan, as provided in Section 42(m)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to plans for allocation of credit among projects. In adopting this plan, the committee shall comply with the provisions of Sections 42(m)(1)(B) and 42(m)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified allocation plan and relating to certain selection criteria must be used, respectively.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 42(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to responsibilities of housing credit agencies, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall allocate housing credits in accordance with the qualified allocation plan and regulations, which shall include the
 following provisions:

(A) All housing sponsors, as defined by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), shall demonstrate at the time the application is filed with the committee that the project meets the following threshold requirements:

(i) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate there is a need and demand for low-income housing in the community or region for which it is proposed.

(ii) The project’s proposed financing, including tax credit proceeds, shall be sufficient to complete the project and that the proposed operating income shall be adequate to operate the project for the extended use period.

(iii) The project shall have enforceable financing commitments, either construction or permanent financing, for at least 50 percent of the total estimated financing
 of the project.

(iv) The housing sponsor shall have and maintain control of the site for the project.

(v) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate that the project complies with all applicable local land use and zoning ordinances.

(vi) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate that the project development team has the experience and the financial capacity to ensure project completion and operation for the extended use period.

(vii) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate the amount of tax credit that is necessary for the financial feasibility of the project and its viability as a qualified low-income housing project throughout the extended use period, taking into account operating expenses, a supportable debt service, reserves, funds set aside for rental
 subsidies and required equity, and a development fee that does not exceed a specified percentage of the eligible basis of the project prior to inclusion of the development fee in the eligible basis, as determined by the committee.

(B) The committee shall give a preference to those projects satisfying all of the threshold requirements of subparagraph (A) if both of the following apply:

(i) The project serves the lowest income tenants at rents affordable to those tenants.

(ii) The project is obligated to serve qualified tenants for the longest period.

(C) In addition to the provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B), the committee shall use the following criteria in allocating housing credits:

(i) Projects serving large families in which a substantial number, as defined by the committee, of all residential units are low-income units with three or more bedrooms.

(ii) Projects providing single-room occupancy units serving very low income tenants.

(iii) Existing projects that are “at risk of conversion,” as defined by paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(iv) Projects for which a public agency provides direct or indirect long-term financial support for at least 15 percent of the total project development costs or projects for which the owner’s equity constitutes at least 30 percent of the total project development costs.

(v) Projects that provide tenant amenities not generally available to residents of low-income housing projects.

(D) Subparagraphs (B) and (C) shall not apply to projects receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(4) For purposes of allocating credits pursuant to this section, the committee shall not give preference to any project by virtue of the date of submission of its application except to break a tie when two or more of the projects have an equal rating.

(k) Section 42(l) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certifications and other reports to secretary, shall be modified as follows:

The term “secretary” shall be replaced by the term “Franchise Tax Board.”

(l) In the case in which the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be
 carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(m) The provisions of Section 11407(a) of Public Law 101-508, relating to the effective date of the extension of the low-income housing credit, apply to calendar years after 1993.

(n) The provisions of Section 11407(c) of Public Law 101-508, relating to election to accelerate credit, shall not apply.

(o) (1) (A) For a project that receives a preliminary reservation under this section beginning on or after January 1, 2016, a taxpayer may
 elect, in the manner prescribed by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, to sell all or any portion of any credit allowed under this section to one or more unrelated parties for each taxable year in which the credit is allowed, subject to subparagraph (B). The taxpayer may make the election to sell pursuant to this subdivision at any time before the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee allocates a final credit amount for the project pursuant to this section, at which point the election shall become irrevocable.

(B) A credit that a taxpayer elects to sell all or a portion of pursuant to this subdivision shall be sold for consideration that is not less than 80 percent of the amount of the credit.

(2) (A) The taxpayer that originally received the credit shall report to the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee within 10 days of the sale of the credit, in the form and manner specified by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, all
 required information regarding the purchase and sale of the credit, including the social security or other taxpayer identification number of the unrelated party or parties to whom the credit has been sold, the face amount of the credit sold, and the amount of consideration received by the taxpayer for the sale of the credit.

(B) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall provide an annual listing to the Franchise Tax Board, in a form and manner agreed upon by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the Franchise Tax Board, of the taxpayers that have sold or purchased a credit pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) A credit may be sold pursuant to this subdivision to more than one unrelated party.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the taxpayer that originally received the credit that is sold pursuant
 to paragraph (1) shall remain solely liable for all obligations and liabilities imposed on the taxpayer by this section with respect to the credit, none of which shall apply to a party to whom the credit has been sold or subsequently transferred. Parties that purchase credits pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be entitled to utilize the purchased credits in the same manner in which the taxpayer that originally received the credit could utilize them.

(p) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee pursuant to this section.

(q) This section shall remain in effect for as long as Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, remains in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   (AB 480)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12207.

(a) For the taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2028, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax,” as described in Section 12202 or 12231, an amount equal to 50 percent of the amount contributed by the taxpayer for the taxable year to the College Access Tax Credit Fund, as allocated and certified by the California Educational Facilities Authority.

(b) (1) The aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated and certified pursuant to this section, Section 17053.87, and Section 23687 shall be an amount equal to five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

(2) (A) For the purposes of this section, the California
 Educational Facilities Authority shall do all of the following:

(i) On a first-come-first-served basis, allocate and certify tax credits to taxpayers under this section.

(ii) Establish a procedure for taxpayers to contribute to the College Access Tax Credit Fund and to obtain from the California Educational Facilities Authority a certification for the credit allowed by this section. The procedure shall require the California Educational Facilities Authority to certify the contribution amount eligible for credit within 45 days following receipt of the contribution.

(iii) Provide to the Department of Insurance a copy of each credit certificate issued for the calendar year by March 1 of the calendar year immediately following the year in which those certificates are issued.

(B) (i) The California Educational Facilities Authority shall adopt any regulations necessary or appropriate to implement this paragraph.
